New Mexico, session 2026, SB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars
($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board
of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in
fiscal years 2027 through 2029 for the university of New
Mexico's graduate medical education program to assist hospitals
in the state to develop and expand physician residencies in
family practice, internal medicine, obstetrics, gynecology and
pediatrics in medically underserved rural areas of the state.
Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029
shall revert to the general fund.
.232835.1